Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,203
Driving under influence of alcoholic liquor or drug; violation of city or village ordinance; fee for test; court costs.

Upon the conviction of any person for violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,211.01 or of driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcoholic liquor or of any drug in violation of any city or village ordinance, there shall be assessed as part of the court costs the fee charged by any physician or any agency administering tests pursuant to a permit issued in accordance with section 60-6,201, for the test administered and the analysis thereof under the provisions of sections 60-6,197 and 60-6,211.02, if such test was actually made.

Laws 1961, c. 188, § 1, p. 579;

Laws 1971, LB 948, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1972, § 39-727.13;

Laws 1978, LB 673, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-669.13;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 298;

Laws 1993, LB 564, § 11.